California, session 20252026, AB1023.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) State law, including but not limited to, Section 2192 of the Streets and Highways Code, prohibits public funding from being used to purchase fully automated cargo handling equipment or infrastructure supporting that automated equipment. (b) The Zero Emissions Port Electrification and Operations project, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 30650) of Chapter 7 of Division 20 of the Public Resources Code, is not eligible for funding under the Clean Ports Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7433) as part of the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law No. 117-169) as it is a stand-alone utility upgrade.(c) Expanded grid and fueling infrastructure will be necessary to charge and fuel human-operated cargo handling equipment and to meet the 2030 goals contained in the San Pedro Bay Ports Clean Air Action Plan.SEC. 2. Article 3 (commencing with Section 30650) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 20 of the Public Resources Code, to read: Article 3. Zero Emissions Port Electrification and Operations Project30650. For purposes of this article, “project” means the Zero Emissions Port Electrification and Operations project or ZEPEO, an electric grid expansion project for the Port of Los Angeles (POLA) undertaken by the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power that will add at least 200 megawatts of electrical power for POLA and the surrounding communities through the expansion of Receiving Station Q at the existing Harbor Generating Station, expansion of Receiving Station C in the City of Wilmington, construction of a switching station in the City of Wilmington, construction of new distribution lines, and construction of new network stations at each container terminal and at Outer Harbor. For purposes of this article, any associated project required for the completion of ZEPEO, including the Avalon Promenade and Gateway Project, shall be subject to Sections 30651 and 30652.30651. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a coastal development permit application that is associated with the project is required to be reviewed by more than one jurisdiction pursuant to this division, that permit shall be considered to be within the boundaries of the Los Angeles Harbor District, and the Los Angeles Harbor Department shall have sole authority to review the application and issue the applicable coastal development permit.(b) The project as approved by the Los Angeles Harbor Department shall be deemed compliant with the land use plan of each local jurisdiction.(c) The project shall not include the deployment, purchase, or installation of any fully automated cargo handling equipment or POLA-owned or POLA tenant-owned infrastructure supporting the charging or fueling of fully automated cargo handling equipment. For the purpose of this section, “fully automated” has the same meaning as in Section 2192 of the Streets and Highways Code.(d) Any additional development project to install infrastructure or purchase or deploy equipment at a terminal within the boundary of the Port of Los Angeles’s Port Master Plan that is not exempt from a coastal development permit pursuant to Section 30610 shall require a separate coastal development permit in conformity with the Port of Los Angeles’s Port Master Plan.30652. Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency that receives a permit application for a permit required for the project, or an additional project associated with the completion of the project, shall review and render a decision on the issuance of that permit within 90 days of submission of the application, or the permit shall be deemed issued.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique need to finish the Zero Emissions Port Electrification and Operations project in the Port of Los Angeles before the target completion date of 2030 and to prepare for the 2028 Olympic Games in the City of Los Angeles.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 14000 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:14000.(a)The Legislature hereby finds and declares that every California youth should be encouraged to reach their full potential, but that many youths require guidance and support to reach their goals and make positive changes in their lives.(b)The Legislature finds and declares that conserving or developing natural resources, and enhancing and maintaining environmentally important lands and waters through the use of California’s young adults, is beneficial not only to the youth of the state by providing them with educational and work opportunities, but also is beneficial for the state’s economy and environment.(c)The Legislature further finds and declares that the California Conservation Corps continues to offer California a unique opportunity to meet both the goal of increasing understanding and appreciation of the environment and the goal of helping youths become productive adults.(d)The Legislature therefore reaffirms its intent that the corps’ mission includes increasing awareness of and improving our natural resources, but more importantly, includes instilling basic skills and a healthy work ethic in California youth, building their character, self-esteem, and self-discipline, and establishing within them a strong sense of civic responsibility and understanding of the value of a day’s work for a day’s wages.(e)It is the further intent of the Legislature that corpsmembers graduate from the corps with good work habits, positive attitudes, and broadened professional horizons. It is the intent of the Legislature that the corps blend academic and job skills training with personal growth opportunities in order to develop productive youths who can make substantial contributions as California workers and citizens.(f)It is the further intent of the Legislature, in memory of Brien Thomas “B.T.” Collins and John E. “Jack” Dugan, and on behalf of their passion, support, and commitment to the mission of the corps, to ensure that the corps is an entrepreneurial and incentive-based program with stable and predictable funding. In pursuit of that goal, it is the intent of the Legislature that all state agencies look to the corps first to perform those projects that meet the mission of the corps.